Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-234
Purpose of sections.

The purposes of sections 3-201 to 3-238 and 18-1502 are specifically declared to be county purposes as well as generally public, governmental and municipal.

Laws 1945, c. 34, § 13(1), p. 169.